trunk/apertium-cy-en/apertium-cy-en.en.dix.xml
<pardef n="pa/y__vblex">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ys</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>id</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                               <e>
        <p>
          <l>id</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>
   
    
<pardef n="ab/ide__vblex">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ide</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ide</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ides</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ode</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ided</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ode</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ided</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>iding</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>iding</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>iding</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>
     
    
<pardef n="approach__vblex">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                               <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>
  
    
<pardef n="admit__vblex">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ted</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                               <e>
        <p>
          <l>ted</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ting</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ting</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ting</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>
 
<pardef n="fit__vblex">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                               <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>


                              <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ted</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                               <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ted</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ting</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ting</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ting</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>
 
    
    
<pardef n="agree__vblex">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                               <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>
 
    

                        <e lm="admit"><i>admit</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="express"><i>express</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="miss"><i>miss</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="pay"><i>pa</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="publish"><i>publish</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="say"><i>sa</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="touch"><i>touch</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="wish"><i>wish</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="pay attention"><i>pa</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/><p><l><b/>attention</l><r><g><b/>attention</g></r></p></e>
                        <e lm="reach for"><i>reach</i><par n="approach__vblex"/><p><l><b/>for</l><r><g><b/>for</g></r></p></e>
                        <e lm="accomplish"><i>accomplish</i> <par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="free"><i>free</i><par n="agree__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="embarrass"><i>embarrass</i> <par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="bless"><i>bless</i> <par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="fit"><i>fit</i> <par n="fit__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="mass"><i>mass</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="cross"><i>cross</i> <par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="decree"><i>decree</i> <par n="agree__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="undress"><i>undress</i> <par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="guess"><i>guess</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="furnish"><i>furnish</i> <par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="omit"><i>omit</i> <par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="fish"><i>fish</i> <par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="prefix"><i>prefix</i> <par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="process"><i>process</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="recess"><i>recess</i> <par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="remit"><i>remit</i> <par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="suppress"><i>suppress</i> <par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="knit"><i>knit</i> <par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="dye"><i>dye</i> <par n="agree__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="bleach"><i>bleach</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="commit"><i>commit</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="impress"><i>impress</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="transmit"><i>transmit</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="staunch"><i>staunch</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="abet"><i>abet</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="arch"><i>arch</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="lunch"><i>lunch</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="bias"><i>bias</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="unfit"><i>unfit</i><par n="fit__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="lynch"><i>lynch</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="replenish"><i>replenish</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="flex"><i>flex</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="dress"><i>dress</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="relax"><i>relax</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="regret"><i>regret</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="tax"><i>tax</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="chat"><i>chat</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="disagree"><i>disagree</i><par n="agree__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="stretch"><i>stretch</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="stress"><i>stress</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="push"><i>push</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="submit"><i>submit</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
